Alaska, session 34, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to article 10 to read: 05 Sec. 14.30.430. Education in history and contributions of Asian Americans 06 and Pacific Islanders. (a) Each school district shall establish and provide to students 07 in kindergarten through grade 12 a program that includes 08 (1) instruction on the history of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders 09 and contributions made by Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders in the United States; 10 and 11 (2) instructional materials that portray the cultural and economic 12 diversity of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders. 13 (b) The department shall curate and make available free of charge to the 14 public on the department's Internet website curricula and materials addressing the 01 topics a school district must include in a program established as required under (a) of 02 this section. 03 (c) In this section, "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.